Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 25 Rhode Island Campaign Contributions and Expenditures Reporting
17-25-10.
Lawful methods of contributing to support of candidates — Reporting — Disposition of anonymous contributions.

No contribution shall be made or received, and no expenditures shall be directly made or incurred, to support or defeat a candidate except through:

The candidate or duly appointed campaign treasurer or deputy campaign treasurer of the candidate;

The duly appointed campaign treasurer or deputy campaign treasurer of a political party committee;

The duly appointed campaign treasurer or deputy campaign treasurer of a political action committee.

It shall be lawful for any person, not otherwise prohibited by law and not acting in concert with any other person or group, to expend personally from that person’s own funds a sum that is not to be repaid to him or her for any purpose not prohibited by law to support or defeat a candidate; provided, that any person making the expenditure shall be required to report all of his or her expenditures and expenses, if the total of the money so expended exceeds one hundred dollars ($100) within a calendar year, to the board of elections within seven (7) days of making the expenditure and to the campaign treasurer of the candidate or political party committee on whose behalf the expenditure or contribution was made, or to his or her deputy, within seven (7) days of making the expenditure. The treasurer or his or her deputy shall cause the expenditures and expenses to be included in his or her reports to the board of elections. Whether a person is “acting in concert with any other person or group” for the purposes of this subsection shall be determined by application of the standards set forth in §

17-25-23

.

Any anonymous contribution received by a candidate, campaign treasurer, or deputy campaign treasurer shall not be used or expended, but shall be returned to the donor, if the donor’s identity can be ascertained; if not, the contribution shall escheat to the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 292, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 20, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 23, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 1, § 9.

17-25-10.1.
Political contributions — Limitations.

No person, other than the candidate to his or her own campaign, nor any political action committee shall make a contribution or contributions to any candidate, as defined by §

17-25-3

, or political action committee or political party committee that, in the aggregate, exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) within a calendar year; nor shall any political action committee make such contributions that in the aggregate, exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) within a calendar year; nor shall any candidate or any political action committee or any political party committee accept a contribution or contributions that, in the aggregate, exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) within a calendar year from any one person or political action committee.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection, a person or political action committee or political party committee may contribute an amount that in the aggregate, does not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) within a calendar year to a political party committee, which funds can be utilized for organizational and party building activities, but shall not be used for contributions to candidates state and local for public office.

Contributions to a named candidate made to any political committee authorized by that candidate to accept contributions on the candidate’s behalf shall be considered to be contributions made to the candidate. Contributions to a candidate by a political committee for another person shall be considered to be contributions by that person.

Expenditures made by any person in cooperation, consultation, or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, the candidate’s authorized political committees, or their agents shall be considered to be a contribution to the candidate.

The financing by any person of the dissemination, distribution, or republication, in whole or in part, of any broadcast or any written, graphic, or other form of campaign materials prepared by the candidate, the candidate’s campaign committees, or their authorized agents shall be considered to be a contribution to a candidate.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict political party committees organized pursuant to this title from making contributions to the candidates of that political party; provided, that these contributions, other than allowable “in-kind” contributions, shall not exceed, in the aggregate, twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to any one candidate within a calendar year; nor shall any candidate accept a contribution or contributions, other than allowable “in-kind” contributions, that, in the aggregate, exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) within a calendar year from all committees of his or her political party. There shall be no restriction on the amount of “in-kind” contributions that a political party committee may make to a candidate of its political party; provided, that for the purposes of this subsection only, the cost of any preparation and airing of television and/or radio advertisements and the cost of any print advertisements shall not be considered an allowable “in-kind” contribution and shall be subject to the aggregate limitation of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

A contribution from an individual’s dependent children, as defined in §

36-14-2

, shall be deemed a contribution from the individual for the purpose of determining whether aggregate contributions exceed either the one hundred dollar ($100) threshold for reporting purposes or the one thousand dollar ($1,000) maximum for contributions to a single candidate or political action committee within a calendar year.

No dependent child shall contribute an amount that, when added to contributions already made by that child’s parent or legal guardian and by other dependent children of that parent or legal guardian, exceed the one thousand dollar ($1,000) maximum for contributions to a single candidate or political action committee within a calendar year.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the amount of money that a candidate can borrow in his or her own name, and subsequently contribute or loan to his or her own campaign.

It shall be unlawful for any corporation, whether profit or non-profit, domestic corporation or foreign corporation, as defined in §

7-1.2-106

, or other business entity to make any campaign contribution or expenditure, as defined in §

17-25-3

, to or for any candidate, political action committee, or political party committee, or for any candidate, political action committee, or political party committee to accept any campaign contribution or expenditure from a corporation or other business entity. Any contribution made in the personal name of any employee of a corporation or other business entity, for which the employee received or will receive reimbursement from the corporation or other business entity, shall be considered as a contribution by the corporation or other business entity, in violation of this section.

Any voluntary payroll deduction and/or contribution made by employees of a corporation or other business entity shall not be deemed a contribution of a corporation or other business entity, notwithstanding that the contributions were sent to the recipient by the corporation or other business entity.

All contributions of funds shall be by check, money order, or credit card and may be made over the internet, but in each case the source of the funds must be identified; provided, that candidates, political action committees, and political party committees may accept contributions in cash that do not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00) in the aggregate from an individual within a calendar year. The cash contribution must be delivered directly by the donor to the candidate, the campaign treasurer, or deputy treasurer. The treasurer or deputy treasurer shall maintain a record of the name and address of all persons making these cash contributions.

Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section, no entity other than an individual, a political action committee which is duly registered and qualified pursuant to the terms of this chapter, political party committee authorized by this title, or an authorized committee of an elected official or candidate established pursuant to this chapter shall make any contribution to or any expenditure on behalf of or in opposition to any candidate, political action committee, or political party.

For purposes of the limitations imposed by this section, all contributions made by a person, either directly or indirectly, on behalf of a particular candidate, including contributions that are in any way earmarked or otherwise directed through an intermediary or conduit to such candidate, shall be treated as contributions from such person to such candidate. The intermediary or conduit shall report the original source and the intended recipient of such contribution to the board of elections and to the intended recipient, in accordance with regulations and reporting requirements promulgated by the board of elections.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 345, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 176, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 443, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 14; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 14; P.L. 2006, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 292, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 221, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 240, § 1.

17-25-11.
Dates for filing of reports by treasurers of candidates or of committees.

During the period between the appointment of the campaign treasurer for state and municipal committees and political action committees, or in the case of an individual the date on which the individual becomes a “declared or undeclared candidate” as defined in §

17-25-3(2)

, except when the ninety-day (90) reporting period ends less than forty (40) days prior to an election in which case the ninety-day (90) report shall be included as part of the report required to be filed on the twenty-eighth (28th) day next preceding the day of the primary, general, or special election pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection, and the election, with respect to which contributions are received or expenditures made by him or her in behalf of, or in opposition to, a candidate, the campaign treasurer of a candidate, a political party committee, or a political action committee shall file a report containing an account of contributions received, and expenditures made, on behalf of, or in opposition to, a candidate:

At ninety-day (90) intervals commencing on the date on which the individual first becomes a candidate, as defined in §

17-25-3(2)

;

In a contested election, on the twenty-eighth (28th) and seventh (7th) days next preceding the day of the primary, general, or special election; provided, that in the case of a primary election for a special election where the twenty-eighth (28th) day next preceding the day of the primary election occurs prior to the first day for filing declarations of candidacy pursuant to §

17-14-1

, the reports shall be due on the fourteenth (14th) and seventh (7th) days next preceding the day of the primary election for the special election; and

A final report on the twenty-eighth (28th) day following the election. The report shall contain:

The name and address and place of employment of each person from whom contributions in excess of a total of one hundred dollars ($100) within a calendar year were received;

The amount contributed by each person;

The name and address of each person to whom expenditures in excess of one hundred dollars ($100) were made; and

The amount and purpose of each expenditure.

Concurrent with the report filed on the twenty-eighth (28th) day following an election, or at any time thereafter, the campaign treasurer of a candidate, or political party committee, or political action committee, may certify to the board of elections that the campaign fund of the candidate, political party committee, or political action committee having been instituted for the purposes of the past election, has completed its business and been dissolved or, in the event that the committee will continue its activities beyond the election, that its business regarding the past election has been completed. The certification shall be accompanied by a final accounting of the campaign fund, or of the transactions relating to the election, including the final disposition of any balance remaining in the fund at the time of dissolution or the arrangements that have been made for the discharge of any obligations remaining unpaid at the time of dissolution.

Once the campaign treasurer certifies that the campaign fund has completed its business and been dissolved, no contribution that is intended to defray expenditures incurred on behalf of, or in opposition to, a candidate during the campaign can be accepted. Until the time that the campaign treasurer certifies that the campaign fund has completed its business and been dissolved, the treasurer shall file reports containing an account of contributions received and expenditures made at ninety-day (90) intervals commencing with the next quarterly report following the election; however, the time to file under this subsection shall be no later than the last day of the month following the ninety-day (90) period, except when the last day of the month filing deadline following the ninety-day (90) reporting period occurs less than twenty-eight (28) days before an election, in which case the report shall be filed pursuant to the provisions of subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this section. Provided, however, if the last day of the month falls on a weekend or a holiday, the report shall be due on the following business day.

In addition to the reports required pursuant to this section, a candidate or office holder shall also file with the board of elections a paper copy of the account statement from the office holder’s campaign account, which account statement shall be the next account statement issued by their financial institution after the filing of the fourth quarterly campaign expense report. The account statement shall be submitted to the board within thirty (30) days of its receipt by the candidate, officeholder, treasurer, or deputy treasurer. The account statement shall not be deemed a public record pursuant to the provisions of chapter 2 of title 38. The board of elections, its agents, and employees shall not publish, deliver, copy, or disclose, to any person or entity any account statement or information contained therein for any candidate, former candidate, officeholder, party, or political action committee. Provided, as to state and municipal political parties, the requirements of this subsection (c)(2) shall apply to the annual report required pursuant to §

17-25-7

.

There shall be no obligation to file the reports of expenditures required by this section on behalf of, or in opposition to, a candidate if the total amount to be expended in behalf of the candidacy by the candidate, by any political party committee, by any political action committee, or by any person shall not in the aggregate exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

However, even though the aggregate amount expended on behalf of the candidacy does not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), reports must be made listing the source and amounts of all contributions in excess of a total of one hundred dollars ($100) from any one source within a calendar year. Even though the aggregate amount expended on behalf of the candidacy does not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) and no contribution from any one source within a calendar year exceeds one hundred dollars ($100), the report shall state the aggregate amount of all contributions received. In addition, the report shall state the amount of aggregate contributions that were from individuals, the amount from political action committees, and the amount from political party committees.

On or before the first date for filing contribution and expenditure reports, the campaign treasurer may file a sworn statement that the treasurer will accept no contributions nor make aggregate expenditures in excess of the minimum amounts for which a report is required by this chapter. Thereafter, the campaign treasurer shall be excused from filing all the reports for that campaign, other than the final report due on the twenty-eighth (28th) day following the election.

A campaign treasurer must file a report containing an account of contributions received and expenditures made at the ninety-day (90) intervals provided for in subsection (c) of this section for any ninety-day (90) period in which the campaign received contributions in excess of a total of one hundred dollars ($100) within a calendar year from any one source and/or made expenditures in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000) within a calendar year; however, the time to file under this subsection shall be no later than the last day of the month following the ninety-day (90) period, except when the last day of the month filing deadline following the ninety-day (90) reporting period occurs less than twenty-eight (28) days before an election, in which case the report shall be filed pursuant to the provisions of subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this section. Provided, however, if the last day of the month falls on a weekend or a holiday, the report shall be due on the following business day.

The board of elections may, for good cause shown and upon the receipt of a written or electronic request, grant a seven-day (7) extension for filing a report; provided, that the request must be received no later than the date upon which the report is due to be filed.

Any person or entity required to file reports with the board of elections pursuant to this section and who or that has not filed the report by the required date, unless granted an extension pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, shall be fined twenty-five dollars ($25.00). Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this section, the board of elections shall have the authority to waive late filing fees for good cause shown.

The board of elections shall send a notice of non-compliance, by certified mail, to any person or entity who or that fails to file the reports required by this section. A person or entity who or that is sent a notice of non-compliance and fails to file the required report within seven (7) days of the receipt of the notice, shall be fined two dollars ($2.00) per day from the day of receipt of the notice of non-compliance until the day the report has been received by the state board. Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this section, the board of elections shall have the authority to waive late filing fees for good cause shown.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 176, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 292, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 299, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 23, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 1, § 9.

17-25-11.1.
Preservation of candidate or committee records.

For every report filed after the effective date of this chapter, the campaign treasurer of each candidate seeking nomination for election or election to public office shall maintain and preserve all records and supporting documentation for a period of four (4) years from the filing date.

For every report filed after the effective date of this chapter, the treasurer of each political party committee and political action committee shall be required to maintain and preserve all records in support of the committee reports filed pursuant to §

17-25-11

for a period of four (4) years from the filing date.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 176, § 1.

17-25-11.2.
Requirements for appointment of a treasurer or deputy treasurer — Examination and certification of accounts.

Appointment of treasurer or deputy treasurer. Whenever a campaign account containing campaign funds received and expended by a candidate, office holder, or treasurer, subject to the provisions of this chapter, receives or expends at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in any year, the account shall require the appointment of a treasurer or deputy treasurer, who shall be a person other than the candidate. For such accounts, a candidate may remain as either a treasurer or deputy treasurer on his or her campaign account; provided, the treasurer or deputy treasurer who is not the candidate shall examine all campaign account records and shall certify to the substantial accuracy of the campaign finance report at the time of filing with the board of elections, on a form to be prepared by the board of elections.

Applicability to political action committees. The provisions of this section as to examination and certification shall be applicable to political action committees.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 21, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 23, § 1.

17-25-12.
Prohibited contributions.

No contributions shall be made, and no expenditure shall be made or incurred, whether anonymously, in a fictitious name, or by one person or group in the name of another, to support or defeat a candidate in a primary, general, or special election. No treasurer or candidate shall solicit or knowingly accept any contribution contrary to the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 292, § 1.

17-25-13.
Penalties.

Any person who willfully and knowingly violates the provisions of this chapter shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation.

The state board may fine any person or entity who violates the provisions of this chapter in an amount not more than one hundred dollars ($100) per violation.

Fines, fees, and penalties imposed by the state board for violations of this chapter shall be paid for by the candidate, officeholder, or entity against whose campaign the fines, fees, or penalties have been levied. Fines, fees, and penalties levied by the state board pursuant to this chapter shall not be paid for from contributions or funds available in a campaign account.

An elected official or candidate for office convicted of violating §

11-41-1

, §

11-41-2

, §

11-41-3

, or §

11-41-4

where the theft is from a campaign account created, pursuant to this title, for the benefit of the person so convicted, all restitution shall be deposited into the Rhode Island crime victim compensation program fund and not into the campaign account of that person convicted of the offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 176, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 383, § 2, effective July 13, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 384, § 2, effective July 13, 2021.

17-25-14.
Maintenance of party organization.

Any state or municipal committee of any political party may receive and disburse moneys for the general purposes of maintaining the organization during the whole or any part of the year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 298, § 1.

17-25-15.
Political action committee — Notice of formation.

No political action committee shall accept any contributions or make any expenditures prior to filing notice of its organization with the board of elections. The notice shall contain:

The name or names of any candidates whose election or defeat the committee intends to advocate;

The names and addresses of all officers of the committee;

The mailing address or addresses of the committee;

The goals and purposes of the political action committee; and

A statement indicating whether the membership and/or contributor base of the political action committee is derived primarily from the employees of one corporation or business entity or from one business or professional group or association or labor union and, if so, the identity of that employer or group or association or union.

No committee shall advocate the election or defeat of any candidate other than that set forth in its notice of organization or amendment to the notice. A political action committee may amend its notice of organization at any time. The board of elections shall prescribe forms in compliance with this section.

In addition to all other reporting requirements, each political action committee shall include in each report required to be filed by this chapter:

The source and amount of all funds received by the committee in excess of one hundred dollars ($100) in the aggregate from a single source in a calendar year; provided, that funds received through a regular payroll check-off plan in which the aggregate contribution from each individual does not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per calendar year shall report the name and address of each entity transferring the funds to the committee, the aggregate amount received from the payroll check-off, and the total number of contributors; and provided also, that funds received by the political action committee of a labor organization from the members of the labor organization in amounts not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per calendar year from a single source shall be reported by the aggregate amount received and the total number of members of the labor organization contributing;

The name and address of each person to whom expenditures were made, and the amount and purpose of each expenditure; and

The name and address of each elected official and candidate for elected office to whom a contribution was made, and the amount of the contribution.

The board of elections may reject the use by a political action committee of a name which is misleading and/or does not accurately identify the membership or contributor base of the committee.

If a political action committee derives more than fifty percent (50%) of its funds from the employees, officers, directors, investors, and/or stockholders of a corporation or other business entity, the name of the political action committee must incorporate the name of that corporation or business entity. If a political action committee derives more than fifty percent (50%) of its funds from persons affiliated with one industry, profession, trade organization, or association or labor union, the name of the political action committee must identify that industry, profession, trade organization or association, or labor union.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 188, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 176, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 292, § 1.

17-25-16.
Enjoining of illegal acts — Forfeiture of contributions.

Whenever the board of elections has reason to believe that a candidate, political party committee, or political action committee, or the campaign treasurer or deputy campaign treasurer of the candidate or committee, has accepted a contribution or made an expenditure in violation of the provisions of this chapter, or willfully and knowingly has made a false statement in any of the reports required under this chapter or failed to file any report, or has otherwise violated this chapter, the board may, in addition to all other actions authorized by law, request the attorney general to bring an action in the name of the state of Rhode Island in the superior court against the person and/or committee to enjoin them from continuing the violation, or doing any acts in furtherance of the violation, and for any other relief that the court deems appropriate. In addition, the court may order the forfeiture of any or all contributions accepted in violation of and/or not reported as required by this chapter. All contributions so forfeited shall become the property of the state.

The court shall also impose a civil penalty not exceeding three (3) times the amount of:

Contributions made or accepted in violation of this chapter;

Expenditures made in violation of this chapter; and/or

Contributions or expenditures not reported as required by this chapter.

All funds collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the fund established for the public financing of the electoral system pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 188, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 1.

17-25-17.
Severability.

If the provisions of this chapter or their application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of the chapter are declared to be severable.

Without limiting the generality of subsection (a) of this section, if the application of any provision of this chapter to contributions and/or expenditures made in regard to ballot questions is held invalid, the provision shall remain applicable to contributions and/or expenditures made in regard to candidates.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 188, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 1.

17-25-18.
Public financing of election campaigns — General purpose.

Whereas, the general assembly finds that the cost of running for statewide office has risen over the last decade at a rate far in excess of the increase in the cost of living; and

Whereas, the general assembly finds that the need to raise ever larger sums of money to effectively compete for general office threatens the essence of our democratic system by excluding many well qualified candidates; and

Whereas, the general assembly finds that the candidate’s need to raise large sums of money can result in disproportionate and inappropriate influence being obtained by those who possess the financial ability to make large contributions to campaigns; and

Whereas, the general assembly finds that the state cannot impose limitations on the amount of private funds raised and expended for election purposes by a candidate unless it provides for at least partial public financing of campaigns;

Therefore, the general assembly determines that it is in the best interest of the citizens of the state to provide public financing to qualified candidates for general office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 3.

17-25-19.
Public financing of election campaigns — Outlined.

To effectuate the purpose stated in §

17-25-18

, public funds shall be made available under the terms and conditions of this section and §§

17-25-20

—

17-25-27

to qualifying candidates for general office who agree to abide by a limitation on the total amount of campaign contributions received and expenditures made for election purposes.

Candidates for general office shall be eligible to receive two dollars ($2.00) of public funds for each qualified dollar ($1.00) of private funds contributed which do not exceed an aggregate of five hundred dollars ($500) from a single source within an election cycle and one dollar ($1.00) of public funds for each qualified dollar ($1.00) of private funds contributed which exceed an aggregate of five hundred dollars ($500) from a single source within an election cycle but do not exceed the limitations on aggregate contributions which are eligible to be matched set in subdivision

17-25-20(3)

, subject to the provisions of subdivision

17-25-20(2)

. The total amount of public funds provided to a candidate shall not exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) in matching funds for a total of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) for candidates for governor; and one hundred eighty-seven thousand five hundred dollars ($187,500) in matching funds for a total of three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($375,000) for candidates for other general offices.

In order to be eligible for matching public funds, each candidate at the time he or she becomes a candidate, as defined in subdivision

17-25-3(2)

, but no later than 4:00 pm on the last day for filing declarations of candidacy for general office, must sign a statement under oath pledging to comply with the limitations on campaign contributions and expenditures and with all of the terms and conditions set forth in this chapter. Any candidate who fails to file the statement with his or her declaration for office shall be ineligible to receive public funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 3; P.L. 1994, ch. 78, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 230, § 1.